Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-426
Visitation and communication; use as consequence or sanction; prohibited.

In-person visitation and other forms of communication, including telephone calls and electronic communication, with a juvenile's relatives, including, but not limited to, parents, guardians, grandparents, siblings, and children, shall not be limited or prohibited as a consequence or sanction.

Laws 2020, LB1188, § 12.